lexc-files/inflections/verb/verb-infl_a-i-u.txt
! negative future optative
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Opt.Neg.Fut.Intr]:^yaquna  IntrOptFutNEG;
^[Opt.Neg.Fut.Trns]:^yaquna  TrnsOptFutNEG;

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! participial-oblique 
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[PtcpObl.Intr]:^yalghii IntrPtcpObl;
^[PtcpObl.Trns]:^yaqe    TrnsPtcpObl; 

!~~~~~~~~~~~~
! precessive 
!~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Prec.Intr]:^vagilga  IntrPrecCnsq;
^[Prec.Trns]:^vagilga  TrnsPrecCnsq;

!~~~~~~~~~~~~
! concessive 
!~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Conc.Intr]:^ghnga  IntrConc;
^[Conc.Trns]:^ghnga  TrnsConc;

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! consequential I
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Cnsq1.Intr]:^ya   IntrPrecCnsq;
^[Cnsq1.Trns]:^ya   TrnsPrecCnsq;
^[Cnsq1.Intr]:^nga  IntrPrecCnsq;
^[Cnsq1.Trns]:^nga  TrnsPrecCnsq;

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! consequential II
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Cnsq2.Intr]:^%{G%}aqnga  IntrPrecCnsq;
^[Cnsq2.Trns]:^%{G%}aqnga  TrnsPrecCnsq;

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! conditional
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Cond.Intr]:^k  IntrCond;
^[Cond.Trns]:^k  TrnsCond;

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! contemporative 
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Ctmp.Intr]:^ngh   IntrCtmp; ! -e is absent, i *think*, when the stem ends in a full vowel
^[Ctmp.Trns]:^ngh   TrnsCtmp; ! e.g. amsanaanghani ['Sivuqam Kiyaghtaallgha Ayumiq' from Lore Vol1]
^[Ctmp.Intr]:^negh  IntrCtmp; ! -e is absent, i *think*, when the stem ends in a full vowel
^[Ctmp.Trns]:^negh  TrnsCtmp; ! e.g. amsanaanghani ['Sivuqam Kiyaghtaallgha Ayumiq' from Lore Vol1]

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! subordinative
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Sbrd.Intr]:^lu   IntrSubr;
^[Sbrd.Trns]:^lu   TrnsSubr; 
^[Sbrd.Intr]:^llu  IntrSubr; ! sometimes -l is devoiced, idk why
^[Sbrd.Trns]:^llu  TrnsSubr; ! e.g. kayusiisqellunga ^[Jacobson (2001) p.101]

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! volitive of fear
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Volitive.Of.Fear]:^nayuka VolitiveOfFear;
